Maine, session 132, LD217.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6310 is enacted to read:
§6310. Access to condoms for students grades 9 to 12
A school subject to this section shall provide access to condoms free of charge to all
its students enrolled in grades 9 to 12.
1. Schools required to provide access to condoms. A school is subject to this section
if that school serves students in grades 9 to 12 and is either:
A. A public school; or
B. A private school approved for receipt of public funds for tuition purposes and at
least 60% of the students it serves are publicly funded students.
A school that meets the criteria of this subsection and also serves students in grades lower
than grade 9 is subject to this section but may only provide access to condoms to students
who are enrolled in grades 9 to 12.
2. Administration of condoms by nurse only; location. Condoms may be
administered pursuant to this section only in the school nurse's office by the school nurse.
A school administrator, teacher, other faculty member or volunteer may not administer
condoms to students.
3. Latex allergies. Before administering condoms pursuant to this section, schools
shall consider and plan for the contingency of a student with an allergy to latex.